src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! # Meänkieli propernoun morphology


!! This file documents `affixes/propernouns.lexc`, [the file for Meänkieli propernoun morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc). The file pointing here is `stems/fit-propernouns.lexc`

!! The lexicon names look like this: `p_mal_1` etc. They have 3 parts, divided by "_"
!!   
!! - In the first part, **p**  = even syll. proper noun, **3p** in lexicon names = even syll. proper noun
!! - The first part gives the semantic tag. Names that can be both plc and sur are marked plc.
!! - The third part is identical to the number in the `affixes/noun.lexc` file. Thus, **_1** points to the lexicon **x1**, etc.
!!   
!! We do not use **_pl** for names

LEXICON p_plc_0
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x0_sg ;

LEXICON p_sur_0
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x0_sg ;

LEXICON p_surplc_0
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x0_sg ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x0_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_sur_4
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x4_sg ;

LEXICON p_surplc_4
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x4_sg ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x4_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;


LEXICON p_21ie
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
 +N+Prop: x4_sg ;

LEXICON p_22oi
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop: x3_sg ;

LEXICON p_nen
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop: xnen_sg ;

LEXICON p_C
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop: xnc ;

LEXICON p_ani_1
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: x1_sg ;

LEXICON p_ani_41
!! - **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: xn_ks ;

!! ... and many more.

LEXICON p_fem_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x3 ;

LEXICON p_org_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: x3 ;

LEXICON p_mal_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x3 ;

LEXICON p_mal_2
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x2_sg ;

LEXICON p_plc_2
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x2_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_xnas
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xnas_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;



LEXICON p_mal_21_odd_i
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_mal_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_malfem_1
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x1 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x1 ;

LEXICON p_malfem_C
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xnc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: xnc ;

LEXICON p_org_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_obj_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_ani_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_mal_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_fem_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_plc_11_ae
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_mal_1C
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xc_sg ;

LEXICON p_sur_1C
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xc_sg ;

LEXICON p_plc_1C
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xc_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_org_1C
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: xc_sg ;

!LEXICON p_plc_1Cv
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xc_sg ;
!@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_sur_3Cv
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_plc_1_odd_i
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_4
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x4_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

!LEXICON p_plc_1ii
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
!@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_1ta ! Viitasaari
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Par:%>^A   K ; ! kiveä
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x4_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_22odd
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x3_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

!LEXICON p_plc_31
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
!@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_31ea
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_plc_31uu
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_sur_21ie
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x1 ;

!LEXICON p_sur_21ta
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_sur_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x3 ;

LEXICON p_surmal_1
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_surmal_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_surmal_C
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xnc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xnc ;

LEXICON p_surplc_1
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_surplc_21ie
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x1 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x1 ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

!LEXICON p_surplc_21ta
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;

!LEXICON p_surplc_31
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_surplc_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_surplc_nen
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xnen_sg ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xnen_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_surplc_C
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xnc ;

LEXICON p_x
+N+Prop: x1 ;

LEXICON p_1
+N+Prop: x1 ;

LEXICON p_plc_nas
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xnas_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_sur_nas
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xnas_sg ;

LEXICON p_fem_21_oi_AO
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_fem_31ia
+N+Prop: p_adhoc ;

!LEXICON p_fem_41
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_obj_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_org_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_plc_11_AO
+N+Prop: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_plc_11_AO_A2I
+N+Prop: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_plc_1_oi_AO
+N+Prop: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_plc_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xn_ks ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON p_sur_11_AO_A2I
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;

LEXICON p_sur_41
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks ;

LEXICON p_surfem_1
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x1 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x1 ;

LEXICON p_malsur_1
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x1 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x1 ;

LEXICON p_surplc_11_AO_A2I
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_adhoc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_adhoc ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_1
+N+Prop: x1 ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_mal_1
+N+Prop: x1 ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_org_C
+N+Prop: xnc ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_1
+N+Prop: x1 ;

!LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_1pl
!+N+Prop: x1_pl ;

LEXICON p_plc_1pl
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x1_pl ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_1C
+N+Prop: xnc ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_sur_C
+N+Prop: xnc ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_1
+N+Prop: x1 ;

LEXICON vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_C
+N+Prop: xnc ;


LEXICON p_adhoc
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n K ;
+Sg+Ind:%>iss^A K ;

!! Vowel stems, odd and even stems

! Saba, Elba

LEXICON p_mal_0 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x0_sg ;
LEXICON p_fem_0 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x0_sg ;

LEXICON p_plc_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x1_sg ;
LEXICON p_sur_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x1_sg ;
LEXICON p_sur_3D +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x3_sg ;
LEXICON p_mal_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x1_sg ;
LEXICON p_fem_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x1_sg ;
LEXICON p_org_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: x1_sg ;
LEXICON p_obj_1 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: x1_sg ;

!LEXICON p2_plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x2_sg ;


! Rinta#maa, Kanava, (odd stems = 3p)
LEXICON p_plc +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_sur +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_mal +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_fem +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_org +N+Prop+Sem/Org: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_ani +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: x3_sg ;
!LEXICON p_obj +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: x3_sg ;


!LEXICON p_malfem_3
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: x3_sg ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x3_sg ;
!
!LEXICON p_surfem_3
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x3_sg ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: x3_sg ;

LEXICON p_obj_3
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: x3_sg ;

!LEXICON p_ks
!+N+Prop: xn_ks_sg ;
