src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun !!≈ * @CODE@
Hattu-Kaaperi:Hattu-Kaaperi p_mal_3 ;
Volodja:Volodja p_mal_3 ;
Välimaa:Väli#maa p_surplc_0 ;
Kvääninmaa:Kväänin#maa p_plc_0 ;
Kalliomaa:Kallio#maa p_surplc_0 ;
Mannermaa:Manner#maa p_sur_0 ;
Batseba:Batseba p_fem_3 ;
Rottiniemenkorkea:Rottiniemenkorkea p_plc_31ea ;
Vuorea:Vuorea p_plc_31ea ;
Sedekias:Sedekia p_mal_ks ;
Santia:Santia p_fem_31ia ;
Löytynoja:Löytyn#oja p_sur_11_AO_A2I ;
Käräjäoja:Käräjä#oja p_surplc_11_AO_A2I ;
Laurinpakkanen:Laurinpakka p_nen ;
Klaarikka:Klaarikka p_fem_21_oi_AO ;
Ilkka:Ilkka p_malsur_1 ;
Kangas:Kanka p_sur_nas ;
Hattukangas:Hattukanka p_plc_nas ;
Tulokas:Tuloka p_ani_ks ;
Eurokas:Euroka p_ani_ks ;
Gavala:Gavala p_plc_22odd ;
Tervala:Tervala p_sur_3D ;
Monola:Monola p_sur_3 ; ! ERVASTI ELLER ODD?
Tervola:Tervola p_sur_3 ; ! ERVASTI elelr annen ODD?
Karhakkama:Karhakkama p_plc_1_oi_AO ;
Rautusvuoma:Rautus#vuoma p_plc_11_AO_A2I ;
Aškenas:Aškena p_org_ks ;
Kööpenhamina:Kööpenhamina p_22oi ;
Samernas:Samerna p_obj_ks ;
Kolalappernas:Kolalapperna p_obj_ks ;
Johánas:Johána p_mal_ks ;
Aittipuolsinkuopat:Aittipuolsin#kuoppa p_plc_1pl ;
Nuorttuvaara:Nuorttuvaara p_plc_11_AO ;
Eira:Eira p_surfem_1 ;
Aaponsammunlaatas:Aaponsammun#laatta p_plc_xnas ;
Kankatta:Kankatta p_plc_3 ;
Evettilusua:Evetti#lusua p_plc_3 ;
Inge:Inge p_malfem_1 ;
Vibeke:Vibeke p_fem_1 ;
Tervamäki:Terva#mäke p_sur_4 ;
Hakomäki:Hako#mäke p_sur_4 ;
Viitaniemi:Viita#nieme p_plc_4 ;
Koskiniemi:Koski#nieme p_sur_21ie ;
Syyrykopanniemi:Syyrykopan#nieme p_surplc_4 ;
Huhmarniemi:Huhmar#nieme p_sur_21ie ;
Mursuniemi:Mursu#nieme p_surplc_4 ;
Kotisaari:Koti#saare p_plc_1ta ;
Pohjanmeri:Pohjan#mere p_plc_1ta ;
Pitkä% Porsijärvi:Pitkä% Porsi#järve p_21ie ;
Suolujärvi:Suolu#järve p_21ie ;
Leppäjärvi:Leppä#järve p_plc_4 ;
Isof:Isof p_org_1C ;
Ai:Ai vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_1 ;
Pohjoismainen:Pohjoismai p_nen ;
Vasarainen:Vasarai p_surplc_nen ;
Undis:Undi p_fem_ks ;
Kryseis:Krysei p_fem_ks ;
Kaskinen:Kaski p_surplc_nen ;
Marjamäki:Marjamäki p_surplc_1 ;
Sammeli:Sammeli p_mal_0 ;
Sammeli:Sammeli p_mal_21_odd_i ;
Talmulahentunneli:Talmulahen#tunneli p_plc_1_odd_i ;
Kaavuonontunneli:Kaavuonon#tunneli p_plc_1_odd_i ;
Hotelli:Hotelli p_obj_1 ;
Åbo% Akademi+MWE+CmpNP/None+OLang/SWE:Åbo% Akademi p_org_3 ;
Malmi:Malmi p_surplc_1 ;
Kari:Kari p_malfem_1 ;
Soudunsaari:Soudun#saari p_sur_1 ;
Kulkuri:Kulkuri p_obj_3 ;
Ek:Ek vanha_nocmp_prop_sur_C ;
Hommersåk:Hommersåk p_surplc_C ;
Nævdal:Nævdal p_plc_1C ;
Gaulhåvola:Gaulhåvol p_plc ; ! ERVASTI?
Leponiemi:Leponiemen p_surplc_21ie ;
Isoniemi:Isoniemen p_surplc_21ie ;
Fenresulven:Fenresulven p_C ; ! XXX Typo?
Jabin:Jabin p_surmal_C ;
Robin:Robin p_malfem_C ;
Pipin:Pipin p_surmal_C ;
Watertown:Watertown p_plc_1C ;
Vo:Vo vanha_nocmp_prop_mal_1 ;
Tornio:Tornio p_22oi ;
Barrios:Barrio p_surplc_41 ;
Ukko:Ukko p_ani_1 ;
Aristarkos:Aristarko p_plc_41 ;
Apollos:Apollo p_mal_41 ;
Sokkuvuono:Sokkuvuono p_1 ;
Eero:Eero p_surmal_1 ;
Faso:Faso p_plc_1 ;
Pegasos:Pegaso p_ani_41 ;
Hanhisuanto:Hanhisuanto p_plc_22odd ;
Ruijan% Kveeniliitto+MWE+CmpNP/None:Ruijan% Kveeni#liitto p_org_1 ;
Roskapuđonlantto:Roskapuđonlantto p_x ;
Ap:Ap vanha_nocmp_prop_org_C ;
Mandrup:Mandrup p_surplc_C ;
Års:År p_surplc_41 ;
Us:Us vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_C ;
Jebens:Jebens p_sur_3Cv ;
Anders:Anders p_mal_1C ;
Gress:Gress p_sur_1C ;
Weiss:Weiss p_sur_1C ;
Markhus:Markhus p_sur_3Cv ;
Ås:Ås vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_1C ;
Oarjelet:Oarjelet p_C ;
Nereus:Nereu p_surmal_41 ;
Timoteus:Timoteu p_mal_41 ;
Androklus:Androklu p_surmal_41 ;
Pegasus:Pegasu p_ani_41 ;
Tractatus:Tractatu p_obj_41 ;
Sosiaalihallitus:Sosiaalihallitu p_org_ks ;
Isokarfuu:Isokarfuu p_plc_31uu ;
Isokarhuu:Isokarhuu p_plc_31uu ;
Putaansuu:Putaan#suu p_sur_0 ;
Uojoensuu:Uo#joen#suu p_plc_0 ;
Ronny:Ronny p_mal_1 ;
Unisys:Unisy p_org_41 ;
Isopysty:Isopysty p_x ;
Ketty:Ketty p_ani_1 ;
Myy+CmpNP/None:Myy p_fem_0 ;
Skopinjänkkä:Skopin#jänkkä p_plc_11_ae ;
Mariatörmä:Maria#törmä p_plc_11_ae ;
Pylväs:Pylvä p_sur_41 ;
Vå:Vå vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_1 ;
Sø:Sø vanha_nocmp_prop_1 ;
Lillebø:Lillebø p_1 ;
Enoš:Enoš p_surmal_1 ;
